Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-218
Oil and gas leases; authority to issue.

The governing board of all lands of the State of Nebraska, except the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, and the governing board of all cities, towns, counties, public power districts, school districts and all other governmental subdivisions of the State of Nebraska are respectively authorized and empowered to lease lands under their control for oil and gas exploration and development.

Laws 1943, c. 163, § 1, p. 578;

R.S.1943, § 57-218.

Cities may enter into oil and gas leases. Belgum v. City of Kimball, 163 Neb. 774, 81 N.W.2d 205 (1957).